Illinois, session 104th, SB3815.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Health Insurance Portability and 5Accountability Act is amended by changing Section 5 and by 6adding Section 65 as follows: 7    (215 ILCS 97/5)8    Sec. 5. Definitions. 9    "Affiliate" means a person that directly, or indirectly 10through one or more intermediaries, controls, is controlled 11by, or is under common control with the person specified. 12    "Beneficiary" has the meaning given such term under 13Section 3(8) of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 141974.15    "Bona fide association" means, with respect to health 16insurance coverage offered in a State, an association which: 17        (1) has been actively in existence for at least 5 18    years; 19        (2) has been formed and maintained in good faith for 20    purposes other than obtaining insurance; 21        (3) does not condition membership in the association 22    on any health status-related factor relating to an 23    individual (including an employee of an employer or a   SB3815 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 19900 BAB 33350 b1    dependent of an employee); 2        (4) makes health insurance coverage offered through 3    the association available to all members regardless of any 4    health status-related factor relating to such members (or 5    individuals eligible for coverage through a member); 6        (5) does not make health insurance coverage offered 7    through the association available other than in connection 8    with a member of the association; and 9        (6) meets such additional requirements as may be 10    imposed under State law.11    "Church plan" has the meaning given that term under 12Section 3(33) of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act 13of 1974.14    "COBRA continuation provision" means any of the following: 15        (1) Section 4980B of the Internal Revenue Code of 16    1986, other than subsection (f)(1) of that Section insofar 17    as it relates to pediatric vaccines. 18        (2) Part 6 of subtitle B of title I of the Employee 19    Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, other than Section 20    609 of that Act. 21        (3) Title XXII of federal Public Health Service Act.22    "Control" means the possession, direct or indirect, of the 23power to direct or cause the direction of the management and 24policies of a person, whether through the ownership of voting 25securities, the holding of policyholders' proxies by contract 26other than a commercial contract for goods or non-management   SB3815 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 19900 BAB 33350 b1services, or otherwise, unless the power is solely the result 2of an official position with or corporate office held by the 3person. Control is presumed to exist if any person, directly 4or indirectly, owns, controls, holds with the power to vote, 5or holds shareholders' proxies representing 10% or more of the 6voting securities of any other person or holds or controls 7sufficient policyholders' proxies to elect the majority of the 8board of directors of the domestic company. This presumption 9may be rebutted by a showing made in a manner as the Secretary 10may provide by rule. The Secretary may determine, after 11furnishing all persons in interest notice and opportunity to 12be heard and making specific findings of fact to support such 13determination, that control exists in fact, notwithstanding 14the absence of a presumption to that effect. 15    "Department" means the Department of Insurance.16    "Employee" has the meaning given that term under Section 173(6) of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974.18    "Employer" has the meaning given that term under Section 193(5) of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, 20except that the term shall include only employers of 2 or more 21employees.22    "Enrollment date" means, with respect to an individual 23covered under a group health plan or group health insurance 24coverage, the date of enrollment of the individual in the plan 25or coverage, or if earlier, the first day of the waiting period 26for enrollment.  SB3815 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 19900 BAB 33350 b1    "Federal governmental plan" means a governmental plan 2established or maintained for its employees by the government 3of the United States or by any agency or instrumentality of 4that government.5    "Governmental plan" has the meaning given that term under 6Section 3(32) of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act 7of 1974 and any federal governmental plan.8    "Grandfathered health plan" means coverage provided by a 9group health plan, or a group or individual health insurance 10issuer, in which an individual was enrolled on March 23, 2010 11for as long as the coverage maintains that status under 45 CFR 12147.140. This definition applies separately to each benefit 13package made available under a group health plan or health 14insurance coverage. Accordingly, if any benefit package 15relinquishes grandfather status, it shall not affect the 16grandfather status of the other benefit packages. 17    "Group health insurance coverage" means, in connection 18with a group health plan, health insurance coverage offered in 19connection with the plan.20    "Group health plan" means an employee welfare benefit plan 21(as defined in Section 3(1) of the Employee Retirement Income 22Security Act of 1974) to the extent that the plan provides 23medical care (as defined in paragraph (2) of that Section and 24including items and services paid for as medical care) to 25employees or their dependents (as defined under the terms of 26the plan) directly or through insurance, reimbursement, or   SB3815 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 19900 BAB 33350 b1otherwise.2    "Health insurance coverage" means benefits consisting of 3medical care (provided directly, through insurance or 4reimbursement, or otherwise and including items and services 5paid for as medical care) under any hospital or medical 6service policy or certificate, hospital or medical service 7plan contract, or health maintenance organization contract 8offered by a health insurance issuer.9    "Health insurance issuer" means an insurance company, 10insurance service, or insurance organization (including a 11health maintenance organization, as defined herein) which is 12licensed to engage in the business of insurance in a state and 13which is subject to Illinois law which regulates insurance 14(within the meaning of Section 514(b)(2) of the Employee 15Retirement Income Security Act of 1974). The term does not 16include a group health plan.17    "Health maintenance organization (HMO)" means: 18        (1) a Federally qualified health maintenance 19    organization (as defined in Section 1301(a) of the Public 20    Health Service Act.); 21        (2) an organization recognized under State law as a 22    health maintenance organization; or 23        (3) a similar organization regulated under State law 24    for solvency in the same manner and to the same extent as 25    such a health maintenance organization.26    "Individual health insurance coverage" means health   SB3815 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 19900 BAB 33350 b1insurance coverage offered to individuals in the individual 2market, but does not include short-term limited duration 3insurance.4    "Individual market" means the market for health insurance 5coverage offered to individuals other than in connection with 6a group health plan.7    "Large employer" means, in connection with a group health 8plan with respect to a calendar year and a plan year, an 9employer who employed an average of at least 51 employees on 10business days during the preceding calendar year and who 11employs at least 2 employees on the first day of the plan year. 12        (1) Application of aggregation rule for large 13    employers. All persons treated as a single employer under 14    subsection (b), (c), (m), or (o) of Section 414 of the 15    Internal Revenue Code of 1986 shall be treated as one 16    employer. 17        (2) Employers not in existence in preceding year. In 18    the case of an employer which was not in existence 19    throughout the preceding calendar year, the determination 20    of whether the employer is a large employer shall be based 21    on the average number of employees that it is reasonably 22    expected the employer will employ on business days in the 23    current calendar year. 24        (3) Predecessors. Any reference in this Act to an 25    employer shall include a reference to any predecessor of 26    such employer.  SB3815 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 19900 BAB 33350 b1    "Large group market" means the health insurance market 2under which individuals obtain health insurance coverage 3(directly or through any arrangement) on behalf of themselves 4(and their dependents) through a group health plan maintained 5by a large employer.6    "Late enrollee" means with respect to coverage under a 7group health plan, a participant or beneficiary who enrolls 8under the plan other than during: 9        (1) the first period in which the individual is 10    eligible to enroll under the plan; or 11        (2) a special enrollment period under subsection (F) 12    of Section 20.13    "Medical care" means amounts paid for: 14        (1) the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or 15    prevention of disease, or amounts paid for the purpose of 16    affecting any structure or function of the body; 17        (2) amounts paid for transportation primarily for and 18    essential to medical care referred to in item (1); and 19        (3) amounts paid for insurance covering medical care 20    referred to in items (1) and (2).21    "Nonfederal governmental plan" means a governmental plan 22that is not a federal governmental plan.23    "Network plan" means health insurance coverage of a health 24insurance issuer under which the financing and delivery of 25medical care (including items and services paid for as medical 26care) are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set   SB3815 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 19900 BAB 33350 b1of providers under contract with the issuer.2    "Participant" has the meaning given that term under 3Section 3(7) of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 41974.5    "Person" means an individual, a corporation, a 6partnership, an association, a joint stock company, a trust, 7an unincorporated organization, any similar entity, or any 8combination of the foregoing acting in concert, but does not 9include any securities broker performing no more than the 10usual and customary broker's function or joint venture 11partnership exclusively engaged in owning, managing, leasing, 12or developing real or tangible personal property other than 13capital stock. 14    "Placement" or being "placed" for adoption, in connection 15with any placement for adoption of a child with any person, 16means the assumption and retention by the person of a legal 17obligation for total or partial support of the child in 18anticipation of adoption of the child. The child's placement 19with the person terminates upon the termination of the legal 20obligation.21    "Plan sponsor" has the meaning given that term under 22Section 3(16)(B) of the Employee Retirement Income Security 23Act of 1974.24    "Preexisting condition exclusion" means, with respect to 25coverage, a limitation or exclusion of benefits relating to a 26condition based on the fact that the condition was present   SB3815 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 19900 BAB 33350 b1before the date of enrollment for such coverage, whether or 2not any medical advice, diagnosis, care, or treatment was 3recommended or received before such date.4    "Small employer" means, in connection with a group health 5plan with respect to a calendar year and a plan year, an 6employer who employed an average of at least 2 but not more 7than 50 employees on business days during the preceding 8calendar year and who employs at least 2 employees on the first 9day of the plan year. 10        (1) Application of aggregation rule for small 11    employers. All persons treated as a single employer under 12    subsection (b), (c), (m), or (o) of Section 414 of the 13    Internal Revenue Code of 1986 shall be treated as one 14    employer. 15        (2) Employers not in existence in preceding year. In 16    the case of an employer which was not in existence 17    throughout the preceding calendar year, the determination 18    of whether the employer is a small employer shall be based 19    on the average number of employees that it is reasonably 20    expected the employer will employ on business days in the 21    current calendar year. 22        (3) Predecessors. Any reference in this Act to a small 23    employer shall include a reference to any predecessor of 24    that employer.25    "Small group market" means the health insurance market 26under which individuals obtain health insurance coverage   SB3815 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 19900 BAB 33350 b1(directly or through any arrangement) on behalf of themselves 2(and their dependents) through a group health plan maintained 3by a small employer.4    "State" means each of the several States, the District of 5Columbia, Puerto Rico, the Virgin Islands, Guam, American 6Samoa, and the Northern Mariana Islands.7    "Waiting period" means with respect to a group health plan 8and an individual who is a potential participant or 9beneficiary in the plan, the period of time that must pass with 10respect to the individual before the individual is eligible to 11be covered for benefits under the terms of the plan.12(Source: P.A. 94-502, eff. 8-8-05.) 13    (215 ILCS 97/65 new)14    Sec. 65. Past-due premiums. 15    (a) Except as provided in subsection (b) for a third plan 16or policy year, a health insurance issuer in the individual, 17small group, or large group market shall not deny coverage to 18an individual or employer due to the individual's or 19employer's failure to pay a premium owed under a prior policy, 20certificate, or contract of health insurance coverage, 21including by attributing payment of premium for a new policy, 22certificate, or contract of health insurance coverage to the 23prior policy, certificate, or contract. The use of "one," 24"first," "second," and "third" in this Section does not limit 25its applicability to situations when terminations or   SB3815 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 19900 BAB 33350 b1cancellations occur in consecutive plan or policy years.2    (b) If a health insurance issuer terminates or cancels an 3individual or employer's coverage for nonpayment of premium in 4one plan or policy year and if the individual or employer 5enrolls in or purchases a new policy, certificate, or contract 6of health insurance coverage from the same issuer in a second 7plan or policy year, the issuer shall comply with subsection 8(a) if the individual or employer again enrolls in or 9purchases a new policy, certificate, or contract of health 10insurance coverage from the same issuer in a third plan or 11policy year unless:12        (1) the individual or employer had past-due premiums 13    from the first plan or policy year and all past-due 14    amounts from the first and second years have not been 15    paid; and16        (2) during the second plan or policy year, the issuer 17    offered a payment plan to the individual or employer under 18    which all past-due premiums from the first plan or policy 19    year would be spread out over 12 monthly billing periods 20    starting with the bill for the first month of coverage in 21    the second plan or policy year and the individual or 22    employer failed to fulfill the requirements of the payment 23    plan through the end of the 12-month period. As required 24    by subsection (a), the issuer shall not attribute payments 25    of premium for the new policy, certificate, or contract to 26    amounts due under the payment plan.  SB3815 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 19900 BAB 33350 b1    (c) Except to the extent that a health insurance issuer 2must adhere to the terms of a payment plan it offers under 3paragraph (2) of subsection (b), nothing in this Section 4prohibits a health insurance issuer from pursuing the 5collection of past-due premiums from an individual or employer 6by any other means permitted by law.7    (d) Nothing in this Section shall supersede the 8requirements of Sections 30 or 50 of this Act. Nothing in this 9Section shall supersede any requirements related to grace 10periods or binder payments under applicable law. Subsection 11(b) shall be inoperative if a court or the United States 12Department of Health and Human Services interprets any 13exception to a provision substantially similar to subsection 14(a) to violate 42 U.S.C. 300gg-1 or federal regulations 15thereunder.16    (e) For purposes of this Section, amounts are not 17considered past due with respect to any portion of a plan or 18policy year falling after the effective date of a termination, 19cancellation, or rescission or after the issuer declines to 20effectuate coverage due to the individual or employer's 21failure to make a timely binder payment.22    (f) This Section does not apply to a grandfathered health 23plan.24    (g) For the purposes of this subsection, "renewal" means 25the continuation in force of an existing policy, certificate, 26or contract of health insurance coverage with the same issuer   SB3815 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 19900 BAB 33350 b1for a subsequent plan or policy year. This Section applies 2only to an individual or employer enrolling in or purchasing a 3new policy, certificate, or contract of health insurance 4coverage and shall not be construed to establish requirements 5or prohibitions for the renewal of an existing policy, 6certificate, or contract of health insurance coverage. 7    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 8becoming law.